Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,101
Public schools; membership in secret organizations, prohibited.

It shall be unlawful for the pupils of any public school of this state to participate in or be members of any secret fraternity or secret organization that is in any degree a school organization.

Laws 1909, c. 121, § 1, p. 461;

R.S.1913, § 6945;

C.S.1922, § 6527;

C.S.1929, § 79-2104;

R.S.1943, § 79-2114;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 163, p. 746;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,125;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 105.